Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-6,105
Retailer, defined.

Retailer means any person engaged in the business of selling or otherwise providing compressed fuel to consumers of the fuel for use in motor vehicles. Retailer also includes any person, other than a consumer of compressed fuel, who has equipment capable of dispensing compressed fuel into a motor vehicle.

Laws 1995, LB 182, § 9.